Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1711
Massage therapy; temporary license; requirements; applicability of section.

(1) A temporary license to practice massage therapy may be granted to any person who meets all the requirements for a license except passage of the licensure examination required by section 38-1710. A temporary licensee shall be supervised in his or her practice by a licensed massage therapist. A temporary license shall be valid for sixty days or until the temporary licensee takes the examination, whichever occurs first. In the event a temporary licensee fails the examination required by such section, the temporary license shall be null and void, except that the department, with the recommendation of the board, may extend the temporary license upon a showing of good cause why such license should be extended. A temporary license may not be extended beyond six months. A temporary license shall not be issued to any person failing the examination if such person did not hold a valid temporary license prior to his or her failure to pass the examination.

(2) This section shall not apply to a temporary license issued as provided under section 38-129.01.

Laws 1993, LB 48, § 3;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 144;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 70;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,281.01;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 618;

Laws 2017, LB88, § 57.